Utah statutes.
63G-6-815 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Appeal to Utah Court of Appeals -- Jurisdiction of district court.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a person who receives an adverse decision, or the state, may appeal a decision of a procurement appeals panel to the Utah Court of Appeals within seven days after the day on which the decision is issued.

(2)  An agency in the state executive branch or a local public procurement unit may not appeal the decision of a procurement appeals panel, unless the appeal is:

(a)  recommended by the protest officer involved; and

(b)  except for a local public procurement unit that is not represented by the attorney general's office, approved by the attorney general.

(3)  The Utah Court of Appeals:

(a)  shall consider the appeal as an appellate court;

(b)  may not hear the matter as a trial de novo; and

(c)  may not overturn a finding or decision of the protest officer or a procurement appeals panel, unless the finding or decision is arbitrary and capricious or clearly erroneous.

(4)  The Utah Court of Appeals is encouraged to:

(a)  give an appeal made under Subsection (1) priority; and

(b)  consider the appeal and render a decision in an expeditious manner.

(5)  The district court shall have original jurisdiction in a cause of action between a contractor and the state for any cause of action that arises under, or in relation to, an existing contract between the contractor and the state.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 91, 2012 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause)

